Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB363.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 454.460 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 454.460 to 454.478:
(1) "Cause of action" does not include:
(a) A procedural action taken or motion made in an action that does not amend or
add a claim for legal, equitable, or declaratory relief; or
(b) Post-judgment enforcement actions;
(2) "Filed in bad faith":
(a) Means presenting to the court a pleading, written motion, or other paper for
any improper purpose, such as to harass, cause unnecessary delay, or
needlessly increase the cost of litigation; and
(b) Does not include:
1. Knowledge, information, and belief, formed after a reasonable inquiry
that the claim, defense, or other legal contention is well grounded in
fact and warranted by existing law; or
2. A good-faith argument for the extension, modification, or reversal of
existing law;
(3) "Goods or services" does not include the creation, dissemination, exhibition, or
advertisement or similar promotion of a dramatic, literary, musical, political,
journalistic, or artistic work;
(4)[(3)] "Governmental unit" means a public corporation, government, or government
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;
(5)[(4)] "Matter of public concern" means a statement or activity regarding:
(a) A public official, public figure, or other person who has drawn substantial
public attention due to the person's official acts, fame, notoriety, or celebrity;
(b) A matter of political, social, or other interest to the community; or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/12/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 22
(c) A subject of concern to the public; and
(6)[(5)] "Person" means an individual, estate, trust, partnership, business or nonprofit
entity, governmental unit, or other legal entity.
Section 2. KRS 454.478 is amended to read as follows:
On a motion under KRS 454.464, or the appeal of an order granting or denying a motion
under KRS 454.464, the court shall award court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, and
reasonable litigation expenses related to the motion:
(1) To the moving party if the moving party prevails on the motion and the court finds
that the responding party's complaint, crossclaim, counterclaim, third-party
claim, or other pleading that asserts a cause of action was filed in bad faith; or
(2) To the responding party if the responding party prevails on the motion and the court
finds that the moving party's motion was filed in bad faith[motion was brought
without good cause].
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/12/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed